Illinois, session 104th, HB2579.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by changing Sections 202 and 203 as 6follows: 7    (750 ILCS 5/202)  (from Ch. 40, par. 202)8    Sec. 202. Marriage License and Marriage Certificate.) 9    (a) The Director of Public Health shall prescribe the form 10for an application for a marriage license, which shall include 11the following information:12        (1) name, sex, occupation, address, social security 13    number, and date and place of birth of each party to the 14    proposed marriage;15        (2) if either party was previously married, his name, 16    and the date, place, and court in which the marriage was 17    dissolved or declared invalid or the date and place of 18    death of the former spouse;19        (3) name and address of the parents or guardian of 20    each party; and21        (4) whether the parties are related to each other and, 22    if so, their relationship; and .23        (5) whether either party is under a court-ordered   HB2579- 2 -LRB104 11494 JRC 21583 b1    guardianship in any state in the United States. 2    (b) The Director of Public Health shall prescribe the 3forms for the marriage license, the marriage certificate, and, 4when necessary, the consent to marriage.5(Source: P.A. 80-923.) 6    (750 ILCS 5/203)  (from Ch. 40, par. 203)7    Sec. 203. License to Marry. When a marriage application 8has been completed and signed by both parties to a prospective 9marriage and both parties have appeared before the county 10clerk and the marriage license fee has been paid, the county 11clerk shall issue a license to marry and a marriage 12certificate form upon being furnished:13        (1) satisfactory proof that each party to the marriage 14    will have attained the age of 18 years at the time the 15    marriage license is effective or will have attained the 16    age of 16 years and has either the consent to the marriage 17    of both parents or his guardian or judicial approval; 18    provided, if one parent cannot be located in order to 19    obtain such consent and diligent efforts have been made to 20    locate that parent by the consenting parent, then the 21    consent of one parent plus a signed affidavit by the 22    consenting parent which (i) names the absent parent and 23    states that he or she cannot be located, and (ii) states 24    what diligent efforts have been made to locate the absent 25    parent, shall have the effect of both parents' consent for   HB2579- 3 -LRB104 11494 JRC 21583 b1    purposes of this Section;2        (1.5) satisfactory proof that neither party to the 3    marriage is under a court-ordered guardianship, or that if 4    at least one party is under a court-ordered guardianship, 5    there has been a judicial determination, as described 6    under subsection (a-10) of Section 11a-17 of the Probate 7    Act of 1975, that the marriage is in the best interests of 8    the person or persons under court-ordered guardianship; 9        (2) satisfactory proof that the marriage is not 10    prohibited; and11        (3) an affidavit or record as prescribed in 12    subparagraph (1) of Section 205 or a court order as 13    prescribed in subparagraph (2) of Section 205, if 14    applicable.15    With each marriage license, the county clerk shall provide 16a pamphlet describing the causes and effects of fetal alcohol 17syndrome. At least annually, the county board shall submit to 18the Illinois Department of Public Health a report as to the 19county clerk's compliance with the requirement that the county 20clerk provide a pamphlet with each marriage license. All 21funding and production costs for the aforementioned 22educational pamphlets for distribution to each county clerk 23shall be provided by non-profit, non-sectarian statewide 24programs that provide education, advocacy, support, and 25prevention services pertaining to Fetal Alcohol Syndrome. 26(Source: P.A. 96-1323, eff. 1-1-11.)   HB2579- 4 -LRB104 11494 JRC 21583 b1    Section 10. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 2Section 11a-17 as follows: 3    (755 ILCS 5/11a-17)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-17)4    Sec. 11a-17. Duties of personal guardian. 5    (a) To the extent ordered by the court and under the 6direction of the court, the guardian of the person shall have 7custody of the ward and the ward's minor and adult dependent 8children and shall procure for them and shall make provision 9for their support, care, comfort, health, education and 10maintenance, and professional services as are appropriate, but 11the ward's spouse may not be deprived of the custody and 12education of the ward's minor and adult dependent children, 13without the consent of the spouse, unless the court finds that 14the spouse is not a fit and competent person to have that 15custody and education. The guardian shall assist the ward in 16the development of maximum self-reliance and independence. The 17guardian of the person may petition the court for an order 18directing the guardian of the estate to pay an amount 19periodically for the provision of the services specified by 20the court order. If the ward's estate is insufficient to 21provide for education and the guardian of the ward's person 22fails to provide education, the court may award the custody of 23the ward to some other person for the purpose of providing 24education. If a person makes a settlement upon or provision   HB2579- 5 -LRB104 11494 JRC 21583 b1for the support or education of a ward, the court may make an 2order for the visitation of the ward by the person making the 3settlement or provision as the court deems proper. A guardian 4of the person may not admit a ward to a mental health facility 5except at the ward's request as provided in Article IV of the 6Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code and unless 7the ward has the capacity to consent to such admission as 8provided in Article IV of the Mental Health and Developmental 9Disabilities Code. 10    (a-3) If a guardian of an estate has not been appointed, 11the guardian of the person may, without an order of court, 12open, maintain, and transfer funds to an ABLE account on 13behalf of the ward and the ward's minor and adult dependent 14children as specified under Section 16.6 of the State 15Treasurer Act. 16    (a-5) If the ward filed a petition for dissolution of 17marriage under the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 18Marriage Act before the ward was adjudicated a person with a 19disability under this Article, the guardian of the ward's 20person and estate may maintain that action for dissolution of 21marriage on behalf of the ward. Upon petition by the guardian 22of the ward's person or estate, the court may authorize and 23direct a guardian of the ward's person or estate to file a 24petition for dissolution of marriage or to file a petition for 25legal separation or declaration of invalidity of marriage 26under the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act on   HB2579- 6 -LRB104 11494 JRC 21583 b1behalf of the ward if the court finds by clear and convincing 2evidence that the relief sought is in the ward's best 3interests. In making its determination, the court shall 4consider the standards set forth in subsection (e) of this 5Section.6    (a-10) Upon petition by the guardian of the ward's person 7or estate, the court may authorize and direct a guardian of the 8ward's person or estate to consent, on behalf of the ward, to 9the ward's marriage pursuant to Part II of the Illinois 10Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act if the court finds by 11clear and convincing evidence that the marriage is in the 12ward's best interests. In making its determination, the court 13must follow shall consider the standards set forth in 14subsection (e) of this Section. Upon presentation of a court 15order authorizing and directing a guardian of the ward's 16person and estate to consent to the ward's marriage, the 17county clerk shall accept the guardian's application, 18appearance, and signature on behalf of the ward for purposes 19of issuing a license to marry under Section 203 of the Illinois 20Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act. If a best interests 21hearing is not held before a judicial officer prior to the ward 22entering into marriage, then the marriage is without legal 23effect and void ab initio. Any person who knowingly enters a 24marriage with a ward without following the procedures of this 25subsection shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony. 26    (b) If the court directs, the guardian of the person shall   HB2579- 7 -LRB104 11494 JRC 21583 b1file with the court at intervals indicated by the court, a 2report that shall state briefly: (1) the current mental, 3physical, and social condition of the ward and the ward's 4minor and adult dependent children; (2) their present living 5arrangement, and a description and the address of every 6residence where they lived during the reporting period and the 7length of stay at each place; (3) a summary of the medical, 8educational, vocational, and other professional services given 9to them; (4) a resume of the guardian's visits with and 10activities on behalf of the ward and the ward's minor and adult 11dependent children; (5) a recommendation as to the need for 12continued guardianship; (6) any other information requested by 13the court or useful in the opinion of the guardian. The Office 14of the State Guardian shall assist the guardian in filing the 15report when requested by the guardian. The court may take such 16action as it deems appropriate pursuant to the report.17    (c) Absent court order pursuant to the Illinois Power of 18Attorney Act directing a guardian to exercise powers of the 19principal under an agency that survives disability, the 20guardian has no power, duty, or liability with respect to any 21personal or health care matters covered by the agency. This 22subsection (c) applies to all agencies, whenever and wherever 23executed.24    (d) A guardian acting as a surrogate decision maker under 25the Health Care Surrogate Act shall have all the rights of a 26surrogate under that Act without court order including the   HB2579- 8 -LRB104 11494 JRC 21583 b1right to make medical treatment decisions such as decisions to 2forgo or withdraw life-sustaining treatment. Any decisions by 3the guardian to forgo or withdraw life-sustaining treatment 4that are not authorized under the Health Care Surrogate Act 5shall require a court order. Nothing in this Section shall 6prevent an agent acting under a power of attorney for health 7care from exercising his or her authority under the Illinois 8Power of Attorney Act without further court order, unless a 9court has acted under Section 2-10 of the Illinois Power of 10Attorney Act. If a guardian is also a health care agent for the 11ward under a valid power of attorney for health care, the 12guardian acting as agent may execute his or her authority 13under that act without further court order.14    (e) Decisions made by a guardian on behalf of a ward shall 15be made in accordance with the following standards for 16decision making. The guardian shall consider the ward's 17current preferences to the extent the ward has the ability to 18participate in decision making when those preferences are 19known or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian. Decisions 20by the guardian shall conform to the ward's current 21preferences: (1) unless the guardian reasonably believes that 22doing so would result in substantial harm to the ward's 23welfare or personal or financial interests; and (2) so long as 24such decisions give substantial weight to what the ward, if 25competent, would have done or intended under the 26circumstances, taking into account evidence that includes, but   HB2579- 9 -LRB104 11494 JRC 21583 b1is not limited to, the ward's personal, philosophical, 2religious and moral beliefs, and ethical values relative to 3the decision to be made by the guardian. Where possible, the 4guardian shall determine how the ward would have made a 5decision based on the ward's previously expressed preferences, 6and make decisions in accordance with the preferences of the 7ward. If the ward's wishes are unknown and remain unknown 8after reasonable efforts to discern them, or if the guardian 9reasonably believes that a decision made in conformity with 10the ward's preferences would result in substantial harm to the 11ward's welfare or personal or financial interests, the 12decision shall be made on the basis of the ward's best 13interests as determined by the guardian. In determining the 14ward's best interests, the guardian shall weigh the reason for 15and nature of the proposed action, the benefit or necessity of 16the action, the possible risks and other consequences of the 17proposed action, and any available alternatives and their 18risks, consequences and benefits, and shall take into account 19any other information, including the views of family and 20friends, that the guardian believes the ward would have 21considered if able to act for herself or himself.22    (f) Upon petition by any interested person (including the 23standby or short-term guardian), with such notice to 24interested persons as the court directs and a finding by the 25court that it is in the best interests of the person with a 26disability, the court may terminate or limit the authority of   HB2579- 10 -LRB104 11494 JRC 21583 b1a standby or short-term guardian or may enter such other 2orders as the court deems necessary to provide for the best 3interests of the person with a disability. The petition for 4termination or limitation of the authority of a standby or 5short-term guardian may, but need not, be combined with a 6petition to have another guardian appointed for the person 7with a disability.8    (g)(1) Unless there is a court order to the contrary, the 9guardian, consistent with the standards set forth in 10subsection (e) of this Section, shall use reasonable efforts 11to notify the ward's known adult children, who have requested 12notification and provided contact information, of the ward's 13admission to a hospital, hospice, or palliative care program, 14the ward's death, and the arrangements for the disposition of 15the ward's remains.16    (2) If a guardian unreasonably prevents an adult child, 17spouse, adult grandchild, parent, or adult sibling of the ward 18from visiting the ward, the court, upon a verified petition, 19may order the guardian to permit visitation between the ward 20and the adult child, spouse, adult grandchild, parent, or 21adult sibling. In making its determination, the court shall 22consider the standards set forth in subsection (e) of this 23Section. The court shall not allow visitation if the court 24finds that the ward has capacity to evaluate and communicate 25decisions regarding visitation and expresses a desire not to 26have visitation with the petitioner. This subsection (g) does   HB2579- 11 -LRB104 11494 JRC 21583 b1not apply to duly appointed public guardians or the Office of 2State Guardian.3(Source: P.A. 101-329, eff. 8-9-19; 102-72, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-258, eff. 8-6-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)